Arkansas, session 2025, HB1873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 10, Chapter 2, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
10-2-135. Notification of service time remaining for member of General
Assembly.
No later than thirty (30) days following the certification of a
candidate as the winner of an election for the office of member of the
General Assembly, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate of how
many years the member may serve in the General Assembly before reaching the
limitation on service applicable to the candidate under Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 73, § 2.

*MBM078*
03/20/2025 10:09:05 AM MBM078